Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 4. Other Disturbances of the Peace

§ 1021.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Bodily injury” means physical pain, illness, or any impairment of physical condition.

“Serious bodily injury” means:

bodily injury that creates any of the following:

a substantial risk of death;

a substantial loss or impairment of the function of any bodily member or organ;

a substantial impairment of health; or

substantial disfigurement; or

strangulation by intentionally impeding normal breathing or circulation of the blood by applying pressure on the throat or neck or by blocking the nose or mouth of another person.

“Deadly weapon” means any firearm, or other weapon, device, instrument, material, or substance, whether animate or inanimate that in the manner it is used or is intended to be used is known to be capable of producing death or serious bodily injury.

As used in this subchapter, “course of conduct” means a pattern of conduct composed of two or more acts over a period of time, however short, evidencing a continuity of purpose. Constitutionally protected activity is not included within the meaning of “course of conduct.”

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 222 (Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 5, 1972; 1993, No. 95, § 3; 2005, No. 192 (Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. May 26, 2006; 2013, No. 150 (Adj. Sess.), § 2; 2015, No. 162 (Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 1022.
Noise in the nighttime.

A person who, between sunset and sunrise, disturbs and breaks the public peace by firing guns, blowing horns, or other unnecessary and offensive noise shall be fined not more than $50.00.
However, this section shall not prevent a person employing workers, for the purpose of giving notice to his or her employees, from ringing bells or using whistles or gongs of such size and weight, in such manner, and at such hours as the selectboard members of the town, the aldermen of the city, or the trustees of the village may prescribe in writing.

§ 1023.
Simple assault.

A person is guilty of simple assault if he or she:

attempts to cause or purposely, knowingly, or recklessly causes bodily injury to another; or

negligently causes bodily injury to another with a deadly weapon; or

attempts by physical menace to put another in fear of imminent serious bodily injury.

A person who is convicted of simple assault shall be imprisoned for not more than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both, unless the offense is committed in a fight or scuffle entered into by mutual consent, in which case a person convicted of simple assault shall be imprisoned not more than 60 days or fined not more than $500.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 222 (Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 5, 1972; 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 23.

Particular cases.

Error in admitting the victim’s testimonial statement to an officer was not harmless because the victim’s statement that she felt pain was the most direct evidence presented by the State on the question of bodily injury, a required element of simple assault by recklessly causing bodily injury. State v. Alers, 2015 VT 74, 199 Vt. 373, 123 A.3d 825, 2015 Vt. LEXIS 54 (2015).

Defendant was not entitled to a judgment of acquittal on a charge of simple assault by recklessly causing bodily injury, as even in the absence of the victim’s inadmissible statements, a reasonable jury could infer that the victim experienced pain when the State presented eyewitness testimony that with his arms around the victim’s neck, defendant dragged her backwards toward a vehicle, that the victim was in a “chokehold,” that defendant jostled her “like a ragged doll,” and that the victim was screaming, “freaked out,” and “beyond herself.” State v. Alers, 2015 VT 74, 199 Vt. 373, 123 A.3d 825, 2015 Vt. LEXIS 54 (2015).

Where defendant and another scuffled, defendant picked up a bottle and the other person picked up a rock and defendant advanced upon the other person, who backed up, at which time law enforcement officers arrived, and defendant never came closer than ten feet to the other person and did not attempt to throw the bottle or lunge toward the other person, conviction of simple assault in that defendant attempted to cause bodily injury to the other person would be reversed. State v. Boutin, 133 Vt. 531, 346 A.2d 531, 1975 Vt. LEXIS 446 (1975).

§ 1024.
Aggravated assault.

A person is guilty of aggravated assault if the person:

attempts to cause serious bodily injury to another, or causes such injury purposely, knowingly, or recklessly under circumstances manifesting extreme indifference to the value of human life;

attempts to cause or purposely or knowingly causes bodily injury to another with a deadly weapon;

for a purpose other than lawful medical or therapeutic treatment, the person intentionally causes stupor, unconsciousness, or other physical or mental impairment or injury to another person by administering to the other person without the other person’s consent a drug, substance, or preparation capable of producing the intended harm;

with intent to prevent a law enforcement officer from performing a lawful duty, the person causes physical injury to any person; or

is armed with a deadly weapon and threatens to use the deadly weapon on another person.

A person found guilty of violating a provision of subdivision (a)(1) or (2) of this section shall be imprisoned for not more than 15 years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both.

A person found guilty of violating a provision of subdivision (a)(3), (4), or (5) of this section shall be imprisoned for not more than five years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both.

Subdivision (a)(5) of this section shall not apply if the person threatened to use the deadly weapon:

in the just and necessary defense of his or her own life or the life of his or her husband, wife, civil union partner, parent, child, brother, sister, guardian, or person under guardianship;

in the suppression of a person attempting to commit murder, sexual assault, aggravated sexual assault, burglary, or robbery; or

in the case of a civil or military officer lawfully called out to suppress a riot or rebellion, prevent or suppress an invasion, or assist in serving legal process, in suppressing opposition against him or her in the just and necessary discharge of his or her duty.

Subsection (d) of this section shall not be construed to limit or infringe upon defenses granted at common law.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 222 (Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 1972; 2005, No. 83, § 6; 2013, No. 96 (Adj. Sess.), § 50.

§ 1025.
Recklessly endangering another person.

A person who recklessly engages in conduct which places or may place another person in danger of death or serious bodily injury shall be imprisoned for not more than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00 or both. Recklessness and danger shall be presumed where a person knowingly points a firearm at or in the direction of another, whether or not the actor believed the firearm to be loaded, and whether or not the firearm actually was loaded.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 222 (Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. April 5, 1972; 1999, No. 149 (Adj. Sess.), § 3.

Particular cases.

Defendant was not entitled to acquittal of reckless endangerment and unlawful mischief, as there was sufficient evidence that he threw a pry bar at a truck when the driver testified that he saw a man in the road holding a large object, which shattered his windshield, there was a divot in the snow where an object apparently bounced off the windshield, police found a pry bar with a broken orange handle inside the home where defendant worked, and the windshield contained orange fragments. State v. Redmond, 2020 VT 36, 212 Vt. 242, 234 A.3d 958, 2020 Vt. LEXIS 39 (2020).

As charged, litigated, and instructed, the aggravated assault charge and the reckless endangerment charge each required an element of proof not required for the other charge and thus there was no double jeopardy violation in convicting defendant of both crimes. Although the reckless endangerment charge and the aggravated assault charge both related to defendant’s pointing a gun at the complainants, an essential element of the reckless endangerment charge was that the firearm defendant pointed was operable and capable of causing death or serious bodily injury, while the trial court instructed the jury that the aggravated assault charge required proof that defendant intended to threaten another. State v. Gagne, 2016 VT 68, 202 Vt. 255, 148 A.3d 986, 2016 Vt. LEXIS 64 (2016).

Information charging defendant with reckless endangerment was sufficient. The language of the information was drawn from the statute and was sufficient on its face to inform defendant of the crime in question; the two accompanying affidavits clearly described defendant’s reckless operation of his truck, including its impact with the complaining witness’s home and the resulting damage, and the fact that the truck struck the room of the complaining witness’s daughter; and defendant made no showing that the perceived lack of clarity in the information prejudiced his defense. State v. Myers, 2011 VT 43, 190 Vt. 29, 26 A.3d 9, 2011 Vt. LEXIS 43 (2011).

Defendant failed in his argument that the district court erred in denying his motion for acquittal from the crime of reckless endangerment based on the insufficiency of evidence of the gun’s operability, where there was testimony and a demonstration regarding the gun’s pump action, shells were found in defendant’s vehicle, the gun itself was entered into evidence and available for the jury’s inspection, defendant adduced no evidence that the gun was not operable, and the gun was not a rusty antique; further, the State was not required to undertake ballistics or other laboratory testing in order to meet its burden on operability. State v. Messier, 2005 VT 98, 178 Vt. 412, 885 A.2d 1193, 2005 Vt. LEXIS 237 (2005).

Where trial court in reckless endangerment proceeding instructed jury that whether rifle allegedly used by defendant was loaded or not was of no importance, instruction was erroneous since legislature, when it enacted this section, intended to proscribe conduct which would place the victim in actual danger of death or serious bodily injury, not mere apparent danger, and consequently, decision in State v. Cushman (1974) 133 Vt. 121, 329 A.2d 648 would be overruled. State v. McLaren, 135 Vt. 291, 376 A.2d 34, 1977 Vt. LEXIS 611 (1977).

Cited.

Cited in

State v. Pike, 143 Vt. 283, 465 A.2d 1348, 1983 Vt. LEXIS 515 (1983); In re Stevens, 146 Vt. 6, 497 A.2d 744, 1985 Vt. LEXIS 420 (1985); State v. Pratt, 147 Vt. 116, 513 A.2d 606, 1986 Vt. LEXIS 380 (1986); State v. Brown, 147 Vt. 324, 515 A.2d 1059, 1986 Vt. LEXIS 409 (1986); State v. Weller, 152 Vt. 8, 563 A.2d 1318, 1989 Vt. LEXIS 108 (1989).

§ 1026.
Disorderly conduct.

A person is guilty of disorderly conduct if he or she, with intent to cause public inconvenience or annoyance, or recklessly creates a risk thereof:

engages in fighting or in violent, tumultuous, or threatening behavior;

makes unreasonable noise;

in a public place, uses abusive or obscene language;

without lawful authority, disturbs any lawful assembly or meeting of persons; or

obstructs vehicular or pedestrian traffic.

A person who is convicted of disorderly conduct shall be imprisoned for not more than 60 days or fined not more than $500.00, or both. A person who is convicted of a second or subsequent offense under this section shall be imprisoned for not more than 120 days or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 222 (Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. April 5, 1972; 2013, No. 150 (Adj. Sess.), § 3.

Particular conduct.

Since defendant’s leaving of Ku Klux Klan flyers at the homes of two women constituted speech and not nonspeech behavior, it did not fall within the disorderly conduct statute. Further, even if the statute could be violated by pure speech, the conduct did not convey an imminent threat of harm, as the flyer was a recruitment solicitation with no explicit statement of threat. State v. Schenk, 2018 VT 45, 207 Vt. 423, 190 A.3d 820, 2018 Vt. LEXIS 48 (2018).

With regard to defendant’s disorderly conduct conviction, testimony that defendant repeatedly punched the complainant’s brother fairly and reasonably supported the conclusion that defendant engaged in fighting behavior. State v. Albarelli, 2016 VT 119, 203 Vt. 551, 159 A.3d 627, 2016 Vt. LEXIS 121 (2016).

In a probation revocation proceeding, there was no support for the State’s position that defendant’s “mouthy and obnoxious” conduct toward his landlord could have given rise to a charge of disorderly conduct. State v. Sanville, 2011 VT 34, 189 Vt. 626, 22 A.3d 450, 2011 Vt. LEXIS 33 (2011).

Defendants’ actions did not substantially impair the effective conduct of a commencement ceremony when a speech was interrupted for less than thirty seconds by defendants’ remarks; one defendant was in the process of leaving the ceremony voluntarily when he was apprehended; and both defendants left the site of the ceremony upon being asked and without further incident. Such de minimis disturbances, even if rude and out of place in the context of a commencement ceremony, could not serve as the basis for criminal liability without running afoul of the First Amendment. State v. Colby, 2009 VT 28, 185 Vt. 464, 972 A.2d 197, 2009 Vt. LEXIS 24 (2009).

Where it was shown that defendant directed extremely vulgar and personally offensive insults at the victim and hurled several items around the room in a fit of anger, and that her behavior alarmed other patrons of the food shelf to the point where they felt compelled to leave, the evidence was sufficient to support a finding that an average person, in these circumstances, could have felt provoked to a violent reaction, and was sufficient to convict her, based on a jury verdict, of disorderly conduct. State v. Allcock, 2004 VT 52, 177 Vt. 467, 857 A.2d 287, 2004 Vt. LEXIS 174 (2004) (mem.).

Defendant’s act of grabbing police officer’s flashlight during a pat-down search on a public roadway could create a risk of public annoyance or inconvenience. State v. Cole, 150 Vt. 453, 554 A.2d 253, 1988 Vt. LEXIS 192 (1988).

Defendant’s act of grabbing a police officer’s flashlight during a pat-down search could be found to be threatening behavior, done to communicate intent to harm. State v. Cole, 150 Vt. 453, 554 A.2d 253, 1988 Vt. LEXIS 192 (1988).

Where trial court found that when defendant was stopped for driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor, she yelled and screamed, kicked and resisted arrest and had to be restrained with ankle cuffs, handcuffs, and a seatbelt, and attempted to bite one of the police officers, the conduct justified the court’s finding of violent behavior as contemplated by subdiv. (1) of this section. State v. Begins, 147 Vt. 45, 509 A.2d 1007, 1986 Vt. LEXIS 359 (1986).

Where defendant, while passing two people on a sidewalk, struck one of them on the arm, leaving a red mark, defendant’s actions were violent within the meaning of subdiv. (1) of this section. State v. O'Connell, 147 Vt. 60, 510 A.2d 167, 1986 Vt. LEXIS 354 (1986).

There was sufficient competent evidence upon each element of crime of engaging in tumultuous and threatening behavior with intent to cause public inconvenience or annoyance to support conviction where defendant, while standing on steps of store, six feet from constable, after being asked by constable to throw beer can away and clear the steps, a request which had come from the store owners, uttered an ethnic slur and with clenched fists threatened the constable, and followed constable into the store and repeated the slur and challenged the constable to step outside behind the store and settle the matter. State v. Pickett, 137 Vt. 336, 403 A.2d 272, 1979 Vt. LEXIS 968 (1979).

§ 1026a.
Aggravated disorderly conduct.

A person is guilty of aggravated disorderly conduct if he or she engages in a course of conduct directed at a specific person with the intent to cause the person inconvenience or annoyance, or to disturb the person’s peace, quiet, or right of privacy and:

engages in fighting or in violent, tumultuous, or threatening behavior;

makes unreasonable noise;

in a public place, uses abusive or obscene language; or

threatens bodily injury or serious bodily injury, or threatens to commit a felony crime of violence as defined in section 11a of this title.

A person who is convicted of aggravated disorderly conduct shall be imprisoned not more than 180 days or fined not more than $2,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added 2013, No. 150 (Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 1027.
Disturbing peace by use of telephone or other electronic communications.

A person who, with intent to terrify, intimidate, threaten, harass, or annoy, makes contact by means of a telephonic or other electronic communication with another and makes any request, suggestion, or proposal that is obscene, lewd, lascivious, or indecent; threatens to inflict injury or physical harm to the person or property of any person; or disturbs, or attempts to disturb, by repeated telephone calls or other electronic communications, whether or not conversation ensues, the peace, quiet, or right of privacy of any person at the place where the communication or communications are received shall be fined not more than $250.00 or be imprisoned not more than three months, or both. If the defendant has previously been convicted of a violation of this section or of an offense under the laws of another state or of the United States that would have been an offense under this section if committed in this State, the defendant shall be fined not more than $500.00 or imprisoned for not more than six months, or both.

An intent to terrify, threaten, harass, or annoy may be inferred by the trier of fact from the use of obscene, lewd, lascivious, or indecent language or the making of a threat or statement or repeated telephone calls or other electronic communications as set forth in this section and any trial court may in its discretion include a statement to this effect in its jury charge.

An offense committed by use of a telephone or other electronic communication device as set forth in this section shall be considered to have been committed at either the place where the telephone call or calls originated or at the place where the communication or communications or calls were received.

HISTORY:

Added 1967, No. 171, § 1; amended 1999, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 2; 2013, No. 150 (Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 1028.
Assault of protected professional; assault with bodily fluids.

A person convicted of a simple or aggravated assault against a protected professional as defined in subdivision (d)(1) of this section while the protected professional is performing a lawful duty, or with the intent to prevent the protected professional from performing his or her lawful duty, in addition to any other penalties imposed under sections 1023 and 1024 of this title, shall:

for the first offense, be imprisoned not more than one year;

for the second offense and subsequent offenses, be imprisoned not more than 10 years.

No person shall intentionally cause blood, vomitus, excrement, mucus, saliva, semen, or urine to come in contact with a protected professional while the person is performing a lawful duty.
(b) (1) No person shall intentionally cause blood, vomitus, excrement, mucus, saliva, semen, or urine to come in contact with a protected professional while the person is performing a lawful duty.

A person who violates this subsection shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

In imposing a sentence under this section, the court shall take into consideration whether the defendant was a patient at the time of the offense and had a psychiatric illness, the symptoms of which were exacerbated by the surrounding circumstances, irrespective of whether the illness constituted an affirmative defense to the charge.

As used in this section:

“Protected professional” shall mean a law enforcement officer; a firefighter; a health care worker; an employee, contractor, or grantee of the Department for Children and Families; or any emergency medical personnel as defined in 24 V.S.A. § 2651(6).

“Health care facility” shall have the same meaning as defined in 18 V.S.A. § 9432(8).

“Health care worker” means an employee of a health care facility or a licensed physician who is on the medical staff of a health care facility who provides direct care to patients or who is part of a team-response to a patient or visitor incident involving real or potential violence.

This section shall not apply to an individual under 18 years of age residing in a residential rehabilitation facility.

HISTORY:

Added 1973, No. 219 (Adj. Sess.), eff. 30 days from April 3, 1974; amended 1995, No. 146 (Adj. Sess.), § 1; 2007, No. 51, § 18; 2007, No. 198 (Adj. Sess.), § 1; 2011, No. 26, § 1, eff. May 12, 2011; 2015, No. 162 (Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 1028a.
Assault of correctional officer; assault with bodily fluids.

A person convicted of a simple or aggravated assault against an employee of the Department of Corrections whose official duties or job classification includes the supervision or monitoring of a person on parole, probation, or serving any sentence of incarceration whether inside or outside a correctional facility, and who was performing a lawful duty, in addition to any other penalties imposed under sections 1023 and 1024 of this title, shall:

for the first offense, be imprisoned not more than one year; and

for the second offense and subsequent offenses, be imprisoned not more than 10 years.

No person shall intentionally cause blood, vomitus, excrement, mucus, saliva, semen, or urine to come in contact with:

any person lawfully present in a correctional facility unless the person’s presence within the facility requires the contact; or

an employee of a correctional facility acting in the scope of employment unless the employee’s scope of employment requires the contact.

A person who violates subsection (b) of this section shall be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

A sentence imposed for a conviction of this section shall be served consecutively with and not concurrently with any other sentence.

HISTORY:

Added 1997, No. 152 (Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended 2005, No. 63, § 25.

§ 1029.
Alcoholism, limitations, exceptions.

No political subdivision of the State may adopt or enforce a law or rule having the force of law that includes being found in an intoxicated condition as one of the elements of the offense giving rise to a criminal or civil penalty. No political subdivision may interpret or apply any law of general application to circumvent this provision.

Nothing in this section affects any law or rule against operating a motor vehicle or other machinery under the influence of alcohol or possession or use of alcoholic beverages at stated times and places or by a particular class of persons.

This section does not make intoxication or incapacitation as defined in 18 V.S.A. § 4802 an excuse or defense for any criminal act. Nothing contained herein shall change current law relative to insanity as a defense for any criminal act.

This section does not relieve any person from civil liability for any injury to persons or property caused by that person while intoxicated or incapacitated.

HISTORY:

Added 1977, No. 208 (Adj. Sess.), § 12; amended 2019, No. 167 (Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. Oct. 7, 2020.

§ 1030.
Violation of an abuse prevention order, an order against stalking or sexual assault, or a protective order concerning contact with a child.

A person who intentionally commits an act prohibited by a court or who fails to perform an act ordered by a court, in violation of an abuse prevention order issued under 15 V.S.A. chapter 21 or 33 V.S.A. chapter 69, a protective order that concerns contact with a child and is issued under 33 V.S.A. chapter 51, or an order against stalking or sexual assault issued under 12 V.S.A. chapter 178, after the person has been served notice of the contents of the order as provided in those chapters; or in violation of a foreign abuse prevention order or an order against stalking or sexual assault issued by a court in any other state, federally recognized Indian tribe, territory or possession of the United States, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or the District of Columbia shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both.

A person who is convicted of a second or subsequent offense under this section or is convicted of an offense under this section and has previously been convicted of domestic assault under section 1042 of this title, first degree aggravated domestic assault under section 1043 of this title, or second degree aggravated domestic assault under section 1044 of this title shall be imprisoned not more than three years or fined not more than $25,000.00, or both.

Upon conviction under this section for a violation of an order issued under 15 V.S.A. chapter 21, the court shall, unless the circumstances indicate that it is not appropriate or not available, order the defendant to participate in domestic abuse counseling or a domestic abuse prevention program approved by the Department of Corrections. The defendant may at any time request the court to approve an alternative program. The defendant shall pay all or part of the costs of the counseling or program unless the court finds that the defendant is unable to do so.

Upon conviction for a violation of an order issued under 12 V.S.A. chapter 178, the court may order the defendant to participate in mental health counseling or sex offender treatment approved by the Department of Corrections. The defendant shall pay all or part of the costs of the counseling unless the court finds that the defendant is unable to do so.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish the inherent authority of the courts to enforce their lawful orders through contempt proceedings.

Prosecution for violation of an abuse prevention order or an order against stalking or sexual assault shall not bar prosecution for any other crime, including any crime that may have been committed at the time of the violation of the order.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 294 (Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended 1991, No. 180 (Adj. Sess.), § 4; 1995, No. 170 (Adj. Sess.), § 30, eff. May 15, 1996; 2005, No. 193 (Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Oct. 1, 2006; 2007, No. 174 (Adj. Sess.), § 4; 2007, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 5; 2017, No. 44, § 3.

§ 1031.
Interference with access to emergency services.

A person who, during or after the commission of a crime, willfully prevents or attempts to prevent a person from seeking or receiving emergency medical assistance, emergency assistance from a third party, or emergency assistance from law enforcement shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added 2007, No. 174 (Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 1032.
Law enforcement use of chokeholds.

As used in this section:

“Law enforcement officer” has the same meaning as in 20 V.S.A. § 2351a.

“Chokehold” means the use of any maneuver on a person that employs a lateral vascular neck restraint, carotid restraint, or other action that applies any pressure to the throat, windpipe, or neck in a manner that limits the person’s breathing or blood flow.

“Serious bodily injury” has the same meaning as in section 1021 of this title.

A law enforcement officer acting in the officer’s capacity as law enforcement who employs a chokehold on a person in violation of 20 V.S.A. § 2368(c)(6) that causes serious bodily injury to or death of the person shall be imprisoned for not more than 20 years or fined not more than $50,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added 2019, No. 147 (Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. Oct. 1, 2020; amended 2021, No. 27, § 2, eff. Oct. 1, 2021.